Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.075

Educational publications printing.

The provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW shall not apply to the printing of educational publications of the state historical societies.

[ 2015 c 225 s 23; 1994 c 82 s 2.]

NOTES: